Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-1101 to 48-1127 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 26, p. 797;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 701, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 48-1125;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 77.